Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB51.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 338 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Political matters" means matters relating to elections for political office,
political parties, proposals to change legislation or regulations, and the
decision to join or support any political party or political, civic, community,
fraternal, or labor association or organization; and
(b) "Religious matters" means matters relating to religious affiliation and
practice, and the decision to join or support any religious organization or
association.
(2) An employer shall post a notice of employee rights under this section in a place
normally reserved for employment-related notices and in a place commonly
frequented by employees.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, any employer shall
not subject or threaten to subject any employee to discipline or discharge, or
otherwise penalize or take any adverse employment action against an employee:
(a) For an employee's refusal to:
1. Attend or participate in an employer-sponsored meeting with the
employer or its agent, representative, or designee, the primary purpose
of which is to communicate the employer's opinion concerning
religious or political matters; or
2. Listen to speech or view communications, the primary purpose of
which is to communicate the employer's opinion concerning religious
or political matters;
(b) As a means of requiring an employee to attend a meeting or participate in
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 10:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 235
communications described in paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(c) Because the employee, or a person acting on behalf of the employee, makes
a good faith report, orally or in writing, of a violation or a suspected
violation of this section. This paragraph does not apply if the employee
knows the report is false.
(4) This section does not:
(a) Prohibit an employer or its agent, representative, or designee from
communicating to its employees any information that the employer is
required by law to communicate, but only to the extent of the legal
requirement;
(b) Limit the right of an employer to offer meetings, forums, or other
communications about religious or political matters for which attendance or
participation is strictly voluntary;
(c) Limit the right of an employer or its agent, representative, or designee from
communicating to its employees any information, or requiring employee
attendance at a meeting or other event, that is necessary for the employees
to perform their lawfully required job duties; or
(d) Prohibit an employer or its agent, representative, or designee from
requiring its employees to attend any training intended to reduce and
prevent workplace harassment or discrimination.
(5) This section does not apply to a religious corporation, entity, association,
educational institution, or society that is exempt from the requirements of Title
VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 under 42 U.S.C. sec. 2000e-1(a), with respect
to speech or religious matters to employees who perform work connected with the
activities undertaken by a religious corporation, entity, association, educational
institution, or society.
(6) An employee may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 10:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 235
enforce this section no later than ninety (90) days after the date of the alleged
violation. The court may award a prevailing employee all appropriate relief,
including injunctive relief, reinstatement to the employee's former position or an
equivalent position, back pay, and reestablishment of any employee benefits,
including seniority, to which the employee would otherwise have been eligible if
the violation had not occurred, and any other appropriate relief as considered
necessary by the court.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 10:08 AM Jacketed